dicts/zu_ZA/zu-ZA.aff
PFX B 0 wobuyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_FUTURE+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 wobuzo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_FUTURE+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 wobw/id [ae] RELATIVE_be_FUTURE
PFX B 0 y/di [aeiou]
PFX B 0 y/i [aeiou] REMOTE_PAST_IND
PFX B 0 y/d [aeiou] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 ya/i [^aeiou] REMOTE_PAST_IND
PFX B 0 yay/id [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 yayi/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 yaying/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 yayinga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 yayingayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 yayingayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 yayingayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 yayingazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 yayingazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 yayingazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 yayiyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 yayizo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 yob/id [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_FUTURE
PFX B 0 yobi/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_FUTURE
PFX B 0 yobing/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 yobinga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 yobingayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 yobingayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 yobingayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 yobingazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 yobingazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 yobingazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 yobiyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_FUTURE+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 yobizo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_FUTURE+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 z/di [aeiou]
PFX B 0 z/i [aeiou] REMOTE_PAST_IND
PFX B 0 z/d [aeiou] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 za/i [^aeiou] REMOTE_PAST_IND
PFX B 0 zaz/id [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 zazi/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 zazing/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 zazinga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 zazingayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 zazingayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 zazingayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 zazingazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 zazingazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 zazingazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 zaziyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 zazizo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 zi/di [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 zi/d [^aeiou] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 zing/efX [aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 zinga/efX [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 zingay o SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 zingayu [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 zingayuk o SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 zingayuku [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 zingayukw [ae] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 zingayw [ae] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 zingaz o SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 zingazu [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 zingazuk o SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 zingazuku [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 zingazukw [ae] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 zingazw [ae] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ziyo [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 zizo [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE

PFX s Y 12
PFX s 0 a .
PFX s 0 ba .
PFX s 0 bu .
PFX s 0 i .
PFX s 0 ku .
PFX s 0 li .
PFX s 0 lu .
PFX s 0 ngi .
PFX s 0 ni .
PFX s 0 si .
PFX s 0 u .
PFX s 0 zi .

PFX n Y 29
PFX n 0 ab [aeiou]
PFX n 0 ab o
PFX n 0 aba [^aeiou]
PFX n 0 abu [^aeiou]
PFX n 0 abw [ae]
PFX n 0 ak o
PFX n 0 aka .
PFX n 0 aku [^aeiou]
PFX n 0 akw [ae]
PFX n 0 al [aeiou]
PFX n 0 al o
PFX n 0 ali [^aeiou]
PFX n 0 alu [^aeiou]
PFX n 0 alw [ae]
PFX n 0 an [aeiou]
PFX n 0 ang [aeiou]
PFX n 0 angi [^aeiou]
PFX n 0 ani [^aeiou]
PFX n 0 as [aeiou]
PFX n 0 asi [^aeiou]
PFX n 0 aw [ae]
PFX n 0 aw [aeiou]
PFX n 0 aw o
PFX n 0 awa [^aeiou]
PFX n 0 awu [^aeiou]
PFX n 0 ay [aeiou]
PFX n 0 ayi [^aeiou]
PFX n 0 az [aeiou]
PFX n 0 azi [^aeiou]
