dicts/zu_ZA/zu-ZA.dic
andlula/BC
bambeza/BC
bhabhathisa/BC
bhema/BC
bhukula/BC
bongwa/BCY
buza/BC
chaphazela/BC
cimeza/BC
cwila/BC
dina/BC
dlunga/BC
ebula/BC
elula/BC
engamela/BC
eshwama/BC
facaka/BC
fiphala/BC
funwa/BCY
gasela/BC
geza/BC
gqabuka/BC
gudlukela/BC
gwinya/BC
hida/BC
hlanya/BC
hlomeka/BC
hola/BC
jikijela/BC
khakhabisa/BC
kheka/BC
khombisa/BC
khulula/BC
khwingca/BC
labalaba/BC
lengisa/BC
londoloza/BC
mangalela/BC
mibika/BC
ncanya/BC
ngqongqa/BC
ntinyela/BC
obuza/BC
phambeka/BC
phika/BC
phuphuma/BC
qhamukela/BC
qondisa/BC
senga/BC
shinga/BC
silala/BC
sukwa/BCY
thasisela/BC
tholakala/BC
tshala/BC
vuma/BC
xazulula/BC
yaluza/BC
zazela/BC
PFX C 0 ng/BY [aeiou] OBJ
PFX C 0 sani/BY [^aeiou] PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayoba/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayok/sY o PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokub/sY o PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokuk/sY o PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokul/sY o PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokum/sY . PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokuni/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokuw/sY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokuy/sY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokw/sY [ae] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG
PFX C 0 sayoli/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayon/sY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayos/sY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayow/sY o PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayoyi/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayubu/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukub/nY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukuba/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukubw/nY [ae] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukuku/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukul/nY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukuli/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukulw/nY [ae] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukun/nY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukungi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukus/nY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukuw/nY [ae] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukuw/nY o PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukuwu/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukuyi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukuzi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayulu/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayungi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayusi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayuwu/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayuzi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazob/sY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazobw/sY [ae] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazoku/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokubu/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokukw/sY [ae] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokulu/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokung/sY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokusi/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokuwa/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazokuz/sY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazol/sY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazolw/sY [ae] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazongi/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazow/sY [ae] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazowu/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazozi/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazubu/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukub/nY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukuba/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukubw/nY [ae] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukuku/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukul/nY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukuli/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukun/nY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukus/nY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukuw/nY o PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazukuyi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazulu/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazusi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazuzi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yab/sY o PRESENT_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yak/sY o PRESENT_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yal/sY o PRESENT_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yam/sY . PRESENT_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yani/sY [^aeiou] PRESENT_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yaw/sY [aeiou] PRESENT_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yay/sY [aeiou] PRESENT_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yobu/sY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yokuba/sY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yokuli/sY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yokus/sY [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yokuyi/sY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yolu/sY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yosi/sY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yoz/sY [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yuk/nY o REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG
PFX C 0 yukub/nY o REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukuk/nY o REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukul/nY o REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukum/nY . REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukuni/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukuw/nY [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukuy/nY [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukw/nY [ae] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG
PFX C 0 yungi/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yuwu/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zok/sY o NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG
PFX C 0 zokubw/sY [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokulw/sY [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokuw/sY [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokuzi/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zom/sY . NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zow/sY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zuba/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zuku/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukubu/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukukw/nY [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukulu/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukung/nY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukusi/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukuwa/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukuz/nY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zulu/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zusi/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zuzi/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX N 0 abang/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 eling/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 engiw/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 esiw/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 n/s a ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 ng/nY [ou] NEG_IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 obung/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 olung/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 w/s [ou] IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
